Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-315
Use of water for hydroelectric plant; rights of irrigation district.

Every irrigation district in this state shall have the exclusive right to make application to the Chief Water Officer for the use of all water used for irrigation purposes and all return flow and seepage water from irrigated land in its district for the purpose of operating hydroelectric plants under sections 46-301 to 46-315.

Laws 1931, c. 91, § 15, p. 259;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-715;

R.S.1943, § 46-315;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 165;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 150.